en: Semi-preserved anchovy in salt
fr: Anchois au sel, Anchoité semi-conserve
hr: slani inćuni
it: acciughe salate

en: marinated fish
fr: poisson mariné

en: Marinated common anchovy
fr: Anchois commun mariné

en: Anchovy fillets
de: Sardellenfilets, Sardellenfilet
es: Filetes de anchoa
fi: anjovisfileet
fr: Filets d’anchois
hr: Fileti inćuna
it: Filetti di acciuga
nl: Ansjovisfilets

en: Anchovy fillets rolled with capers, Semi-preserved anchovy fillets rolled with capers
fr: Filets d'anchois roulés aux câpres, Filets d'anchois roulés aux câpres en semi-conserve

en: Anchovy fillets in oil
fr: Filets d'anchois à l'huile
hr: Filete inćuna u ulju
it: Filetti di acciughe sott'olio
zh: 油浸鳀鱼片

en: Semi-preserved anchovy fillets in oil
fr: Filets d'anchois à l'huile en semi-conserve

en: Marinated anchovy fillets
de: Marinierte Anchovifilets
fr: Filets d'anchois marinés
hr: Marinirani fileti inćuna
it: filetti di acciughe marinati

en: Anchovy fillets marinated in garlic and parsley
fr: Filets d'anchois marinés à l'ail et au persil
zh: 蒜香欧芹腌鳀鱼片

en: Marinated anchovy fillets with vegetable oil
fr: Filets d'anchois marinés à l'huile végétale

en: Marinated anchovy fillets with confit lemon
fr: Filets d'anchois marinés au citron confit

en: Capelin
fr: Capelan
hr: Kapelin
ja: カラフトシシャモ

en: Capelin roe
fr: Œufs de capelan, Masago, Œufs Masago

en: Cod fillets
de: Kabeljaufilets, Kabeljaufilet
es: Filetes de bacalao
fi: turskafileet
fr: Filets de cabillaud
hr: Fileti bakalara
it: Filetti di merluzzo
nl: Kabeljauwfilets

en: Frozen cod fillets
fr: Filets de cabillaud surgelés

en: Breaded cod fillets
fr: Filets de cabillaud panés

en: Whiting fillets
fr: Filets de merlan
hr: Fileti belanaca
nl: Wijtingfilets

en: Iridescent shark fillets, pangasius fillets
de: Pangasiusfilets, Pangasiusfilet
fr: Filets de pangas
hr: Šareničasti fileti morskog psa
nl: Pangasiusfilets

en: Sardine fillets
de: Sardinenfilets, Sardinenfilet
es: Filetes de sardinas
fi: sardiinifileitä
fr: Filets de sardines
hr: Fileti sardina
it: Filetti di sardine
nl: Sardientjesfilets

en: Tuna fillets
de: Thunfischfilets, Thunfischfilet
es: Filetes de Atún
fi: tonnikalafileet
fr: Filets de thon
hr: Fileti tune
it: Filetti di tonno
nl: Tonijnfilets
pl: Filety z tuńczyka
pt: Filetes de atum